fst/hindiguesser.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Adj +Sg +Pl +Masc +Fem +Direct +Oblique +Dim +Anim +Inani +Inf +V

LEXICON Surface

<[व | े | ै | ए | ऐ | र | ृ | त | थ | य | ञ | ु | ू | उ | ऊ | ि | ी | इ | ई | ो | ौ | ओ | औ | प | फ | ा | आ | अ | आ | स | ष | द | ध | ट | ठ | ग | घ | ह | ः | ज | झ | क | ख | ल | ॢ | श | ॅ | ् | ॉ | च | छ | ड | ढ | ब | भ | न | ण | म | ॰ | ़ | ं | ँ ]+> Suffix;

LEXICON Suffix

Adjective;
Noun;
Verb;

LEXICON Adjective

+Adj:0           #;
+Adj+Fem:^ी     #;
+Adj+Masc+Sg:^ा #;
+Adj+Masc+Pl:^े #;

LEXICON Noun

ा+N+Masc+Sg+Anim:ा NCaseMascSg;
ा+N+Fem+Sg+Anim:ी NCaseFemSg;


ी+N+Masc+Sg+Anim:ी NCaseMascSg;
ी+N+Fem+Sg+Anim:न NCaseFemSg;

ा+N+Masc+Sg+Inanim:ा NCaseMascSg;
ा+N+Fem+Sg+Inanim+Dim:िया NCaseFemSg;
ा+N+Fem+Sg+Inanim+Dim:ी NCaseFemSg;

+N+Masc+Sg:0 NCaseMascSg;

+N+Masc+Sg+Anim:0 NCaseMascSg;
+N+Fem+Sg+Anim:नी NCaseFemSg;
+N+Fem+Sg+Anim:ी NCaseFemSg;

ा+N+Masc+Pl:े NCasePl;
+N+Masc+Pl:0 NCasePl;
ी+N+Fem+Pl:ियाँ NCasePl;
+N+Fem+Pl:ें NCasePl;

LEXICON NCaseMascSg:

+Direct:0 #;
+Oblique:^े #;
+Vocative:^े #;

LEXICON NCasePl:

+Direct:0 #;
+Oblique:^ों #;
+Vocative:^ो #;

LEXICON NCaseFemSg:

+Direct:0 #;
+Oblique:^ी #;
+Vocative:^ी #;

LEXICON Verb:

+V+Inf:^ना #;
